District of Columbia statutes.
50-1908

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Collision” means an impact between the operator’s watercraft, or anything attached to or transported by the watercraft, and anything else, regardless of whether it is a person, a wild or domestic animal, real property, or personal property.

(2)

“Watercraft” means a boat, ship, or other craft used for water transportation, as well as water skis, aquaplane, sailboard, or similar vessel.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1017, Pub. L. 92-519, § 7a
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(e), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of subchapter, see § 101(e) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).